Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-1447
Manufacturer-dealer agreement; required, when.

(1) A manufacturer or distributor shall not sell a new recreational vehicle in this state to or through a dealer without having first entered into a manufacturer-dealer agreement with such dealer. Any such agreement shall be signed by both parties.

(2) This section applies beginning on January 1, 2028.

Laws 2026, LB972, § 6.
October 1, 2026